Illinois, session 104th, HB2243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Gasoline Storage Act is amended by changing 5Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 15/0.01)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 152.9)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Gasoline Storage Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)